Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.082

Tuition recovery trust fund—Established.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The tuition recovery trust fund is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The agency shall deposit in the fund all moneys received under RCW 28C.10.084. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes under RCW 28C.10.084. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the agency. Disbursements from the fund shall only be used to reimburse students who are Washington state residents, or agencies or businesses that pay tuition and fees on behalf of Washington students. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the tuition recovery trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the fund. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

[ 2014 c 11 s 4; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 965; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 85; 1987 c 459 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.